Washington statutes.
RCW 19.174.080

Chapter supersedes local government actions.

This chapter supersedes and preempts all rules, regulations, codes, statutes, or ordinances of all cities, counties, municipalities, and local agencies regarding customer safety at automated teller machines or night deposit facilities located in this state.

[ 1993 c 324 s 8.]